dev/ortho/ara-lat.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 

!%{n%} ! possible apostrophe to disambiguate ڭ from نگ
%{h%}
%{g%}

LEXICON Root 

Alpha ; 

Punct ; 
!Exceptions ;
Digits ;

LEXICON AlphaLoop 

Alpha ;
!Punct ; 
# ;

LEXICON Alpha

ا:ا AlphaLoop ;
ە:ە AlphaLoop ;
ب:ب AlphaLoop ;
پ:پ AlphaLoop ;
ت:ت AlphaLoop ;
ج:ج AlphaLoop ;
چ:چ%{h%} AlphaLoop ;
خ:خ AlphaLoop ;
د:د AlphaLoop ;
ر:ر AlphaLoop ;
ز:ز AlphaLoop ;
ژ:ژ%{h%} AlphaLoop ;
س:س AlphaLoop ;
ش:ش%{h%} AlphaLoop ;
غ:غ%{h%} AlphaLoop ;
ف:ف AlphaLoop ;
ق:ق AlphaLoop ;
ك:ك%{g%} AlphaLoop ;
گ:گ AlphaLoop ;
ڭ:ڭ AlphaLoop ;
ل:ل AlphaLoop ;
م:م AlphaLoop ;
ن:ن AlphaLoop ;
ھ:ھ AlphaLoop ;
و:و AlphaLoop ;
ۇ:ۇ AlphaLoop ;
ۆ:ۆ AlphaLoop ;
ۈ:ۈ AlphaLoop ;
ۋ:ۋ AlphaLoop ;
ې:ې AlphaLoop ;
ى:ى AlphaLoop ;
ي:ي AlphaLoop ;
ک:ک AlphaLoop ;
ئ:ئ AlphaLoop ;

# ;

LEXICON Digits

<[%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+> # ;

LEXICON Punct

%.:%. # ; 
%-:%- # ; 
%,:%, # ; 
!%,:%، # ;  ! Arabic comma
!،:، # ;
!,:، # ;
%;:%; # ; 
%::%: # ; 
%!:%! # ; 
%?:%? # ; 
%“:%“ # ; 
%”:%” # ; 
%«:%« # ; 
%»:%» # ; 
%(:%( # ; 
%):%) # ; 
%–:%– # ; 
